Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.323.040

Joint school districts—Designation of county to which joint school district belongs.

For all purposes essential to the maintenance, operation, and administration of the schools of a district, including the apportionment of current state and county school funds, the county in which a joint school district shall be considered as belonging shall be as designated by the superintendent of public instruction. Prior to making such designation, the superintendent of public instruction shall hold at least one public hearing on the matter, at which time the recommendation of the joint school district shall be presented and, in addition to such recommendation, the superintendent shall consider the following prior to its designation:

(1) Service needs of such district;

(2) Availability of services;

(3) Geographic location of district and servicing agencies; and

(4) Relationship to contiguous school districts.

[ 2006 c 263 s 613; 1973 c 47 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.250. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 27; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-46. Formerly RCW 28A.315.380, 28A.57.250, 28.57.250.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1973 c 47: See note following RCW 28A.323.010.